test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-teytt_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - teâtt â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     teâtt+N+Sg+Nom: teâtt
     teâtt+N+Sg+Gen: teâđ
     teâtt+N+Sg+Acc: teâđ
     teâtt+N+Sg+Ill: tiõtˈtu
     teâtt+N+Sg+Loc: teâđast
     teâtt+N+Sg+Com: teâđain
     teâtt+N+Ess: teâttan
     teâtt+N+Par: teâttad
     teâtt+N+Sg+Abe: [teâđtaa, teâđtää]
     teâtt+N+Pl+Nom: teâđ
     teâtt+N+Pl+Gen: teâđai
     teâtt+N+Pl+Acc: teâđaid
     teâtt+N+Pl+Ill: teâđaid
     teâtt+N+Pl+Loc: teâđain
     teâtt+N+Pl+Com: teâđaivuiʹm
     teâtt+N+Pl+Abe: [teâđaitaa, teâđaitää]
